Ohio, session 136, HB115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3704.14, 4503.10, 4503.102, and 6
4503.103 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: 7
Sec. 3704.14. (A)(1) If the director of environmental 8
protection determines that implementation of a motor vehicle 9
inspection and maintenance program is necessary for the state to 10
effectively comply with the federal Clean Air Act after June 30, 11
2023, the director may provide for the implementation of the 12
program in those counties in this state in which such a program 13
is federally mandated. Upon making such a determination, the 14
director of environmental protection may request the director of 15
administrative services to extend the terms of the contract that 16
was entered into under the authority of Am. Sub. H.B. 64 of the 17
131st general assembly. Upon receiving the request, the director 18

H. B. No. 115 Page 2
As Introduced
of administrative services shall extend the contract, beginning 19
on July 1, 2023, in accordance with this section. The contract 20
shall be extended for a period of up to twenty-four months with 21
the contractor who conducted the motor vehicle inspection and 22
maintenance program under that contract. 23
(2) Prior to the expiration of the contract extension that 24
is authorized by division (A)(1) of this section, the director 25
of environmental protection shall request the director of 26
administrative services to enter into a contract with a vendor 27
to operate a decentralized motor vehicle inspection and 28
maintenance program in each county in this state in which such a 29
program is federally mandated through June 30, 2027, with an 30
option for the state to renew the contract for a period of up to 31
twenty-four months through June 30, 2029. The contract shall 32
ensure that the decentralized motor vehicle inspection and 33
maintenance program achieves at least the same emission 34
reductions as achieved by the program operated under the 35
authority of the contract that was extended under division (A) 36
(1) of this section. The director of administrative services 37
shall select a vendor through a competitive selection process in 38
compliance with Chapter 125. of the Revised Code. 39
(3) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the director 40
of administrative services shall ensure that a competitive 41
selection process regarding a contract to operate a 42
decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program 43
in this state incorporates the following, which shall be 44
included in the contract: 45
(a) For purposes of expanding the number of testing 46
locations for consumer convenience, a requirement that the 47
vendor utilize established local businesses, auto repair 48

H. B. No. 115 Page 3
As Introduced
facilities, or leased properties to operate state-approved 49
inspection and maintenance testing facilities; 50
(b) A requirement that the vendor selected to operate the 51
program provide notification of the program's requirements to 52
each owner of a motor vehicle that is required to be inspected 53
under the program. The contract shall require the notification 54
to be provided not later than sixty days prior to the date by 55
which the owner of the motor vehicle is required to have the 56
motor vehicle inspected. The director of environmental 57
protection and the vendor shall jointly agree on the content of 58
the notice. However, the notice shall include at a minimum the 59
locations of all inspection facilities within a specified 60
distance of the address that is listed on the owner's motor 61
vehicle registration; 62
(c) A requirement that the vendor comply with testing 63
methodology and supply the required equipment approved by the 64
director of environmental protection as specified in the 65
competitive selection process in compliance with Chapter 125. of 66
the Revised Code. 67
(4) A decentralized motor vehicle inspection and 68
maintenance program operated under this section shall comply 69
with division (B) of this section. The director of environmental 70
protection shall administer the decentralized motor vehicle 71
inspection and maintenance program operated under this section. 72
(B) The director shall establish a decentralized motor 73
vehicle inspection and maintenance program as authorized by this 74
section and, at a minimum, the director shall do ensure that the 75
program does all of the following: 76
(1) Comply Complies with the federal Clean Air Act; 77

H. B. No. 115 Page 4
As Introduced
(2) Provide Provides for the issuance of inspection 78
certificates and alternative emissions certificates as specified 79
in rules adopted under division (C)(2) of this section; 80
(3) Provide Provides for a new car exemption for motor 81
vehicles four six years old or newer and provide provides that a 82
new motor vehicle is exempt for four six years regardless of 83
whether legal title to the motor vehicle is transferred during 84
that period; 85
(4) Provide Provides for an exemption for battery electric 86
motor vehicles; 87
(5) Provides for an exemption for hybrid motor vehicles 88
seven years old or newer and provides that a hybrid motor 89
vehicle is exempt for seven years regardless of whether legal 90
title to the motor vehicle is transferred during that period. 91
(C)(1) The director of environmental protection shall 92
adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code 93
that the director determines are necessary to implement this 94
section. The director may continue to implement and enforce 95
rules pertaining to the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance 96
program previously implemented under former section 3704.14 of 97
the Revised Code as that section existed prior to its repeal and 98
reenactment by Am. Sub. H.B. 66 of the 126th general assembly, 99
provided that the rules do not conflict with this section. 100
(2) The director of environmental protection shall issue 101
an inspection certificate provided for under division (B)(2) of 102
this section in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised 103
Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: 104
(a) The individual holds a certificate or license in 105
another state. 106

H. B. No. 115 Page 5
As Introduced
(b) The individual has satisfactory work experience, a 107
government certification, or a private certification as 108
described in that chapter as a vehicle inspector in a state that 109
does not issue that certificate. 110
The rules adopted under division (C)(1) of this section 111
shall provide for the issuance of inspections certificates and 112
alternative emissions certificates. Under the rules, an 113
inspection certificate shall be issued to the owner or lessee of 114
a motor vehicle when the motor vehicle passes an emissions 115
inspection conducted in accordance with the motor vehicle 116
inspection and maintenance program established under this 117
section. In lieu of obtaining an inspection certificate, the 118
rules shall establish a system by which the owner or lessee of a 119
motor vehicle may request an alternative emissions certificate 120
from the director. 121
(a) The rules providing for the issuance of alternative 122
emissions certificates shall require an owner or lessee of a 123
motor vehicle to do the following in order to receive the 124
certificate: 125
(i) Complete and submit an attestation form created by the 126
director that includes a statement that reads substantially as 127
follows: 128
"I, _______, attest that, to the best of my knowledge, the 129
motor vehicle concerning which I am the owner or lessee complies 130
with all laws of Ohio and the United States governing motor 131
vehicle emissions. I, ______, am aware that a false statement on 132
this form is not permitted." 133
(ii) Sign and date the form either manually or 134
electronically; 135

H. B. No. 115 Page 6
As Introduced
(iii) Submit the form to the director either by regular 136
mail, certified mail, or electronically. 137
(b) The rules shall require the director to include both 138
of the following additional information on the attestation form: 139
(i) A provision that allows the owner or lessee of a motor 140
vehicle to specify one of the following methods by which the 141
owner or lessee may request delivery of the alternative 142
emissions certificate: certified mail, noncertified mail, or 143
electronically; 144
(ii) A provision that allows the owner or lessee of a 145
motor vehicle to specify the vehicle identification number, 146
make, model, and year of the relevant motor vehicle and the date 147
the attestation form is submitted to the director. 148
(c) Subject to division (C)(2)(d) of this section, the 149
rules shall require the director to deliver an alternative 150
emission certificate to the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle 151
who complies with rules adopted under division (C)(2)(a) of this 152
section. The director shall deliver the certificate within 153
thirty business days after the director's receipt of the 154
attestation form or, if the owner or lessee submits the form 155
electronically, within five business days after receipt of the 156
form. The director shall confirm the receipt of the attestation 157
form if the director receives it by electronic means. 158
(d) The rules shall require the director to reject an 159
attestation form for any of the following reasons: 160
(i) The motor vehicle that is the subject of the 161
attestation form was in an accident or collision within the two 162
years prior to the date of submission of the form, and the 163
accident or collision caused substantial damage to the internal 164

H. B. No. 115 Page 7
As Introduced
structure of the motor vehicle. 165
(ii) The owner or lessee of the motor vehicle that is the 166
subject of the attestation form has received a ticket, citation, 167
or summons with regard to that motor vehicle within the two 168
years prior to the date of submission of the form for a 169
violation of section 4513.22 of the Revised Code or 170
substantially equivalent municipal ordinance. 171
(iii) The information in the attestation form is 172
determined by the director to be false. 173
If the director rejects an attestation form under division 174
(C)(2)(d)(iii) of this section, the director shall provide 175
notice to the owner or lessee that the attestation form was 176
determined to be false. The notice shall inform the owner or 177
lessee that the owner or lessee may submit a corrected form to 178
the director within thirty days of the receipt of the notice. If 179
the owner or lessee submits a corrected attestation form that 180
complies with rules adopted under division (C)(2) of this 181
section within that thirty-day period, the director shall issue 182
an alternative emissions certificate to the owner or lessee. If 183
the owner or lessee fails to correct the attestation form, the 184
director shall require the owner or lessee to complete an 185
emissions inspection and obtain an inspection certificate in 186
accordance with rules adopted under this section. 187
If the director rejects an attestation form under division 188
(C)(2)(d)(i) or (ii) of this section, the director shall require 189
the owner or lessee to complete an emissions inspection and 190
obtain an inspection certificate in accordance with rules 191
adopted under this section. 192
(e) In adopting rules under division (C)(2) of this 193

H. B. No. 115 Page 8
As Introduced
section, the director shall ensure that the owner or lessee of a 194
motor vehicle who falsifies an attestation form receives a 195
notice that includes a statement that reads substantially as 196
follows: "You have falsified an attestation form for your 197
vehicle under the E-Check/motor vehicle emissions testing 198
program. Your vehicle is registered in one of [insert the number 199
of counties] counties in this state that has federal emission 200
mandates imposed on it that the State of Ohio is required, under 201
threat of penalty, to enforce. This letter serves as Ohio's only 202
penalty for falsification of an attestation form. You have 203
thirty days from the date of this notice to amend your 204
attestation form and submit the amended form to the 205
Environmental Protection Agency. However, if you choose not to 206
submit an amended attestation form, you must have a motor 207
vehicle emissions inspection conducted for your vehicle in 208
accordance with section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules 209
adopted under it." 210
(f) No penalties apply to a person who the director has 211
determined to have falsified an attestation form, other than the 212
issuance of the notice required under division (C)(2)(e) of this 213
section. 214
(D) There is hereby created in the state treasury the auto 215
emissions test fund, which shall consist of money received by 216
the director from any cash transfers, state and local grants, 217
and other contributions that are received for the purpose of 218
funding the program established under this section. The director 219
of environmental protection shall use money in the fund solely 220
for the implementation, supervision, administration, operation, 221
and enforcement of the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance 222
program established under this section. Money in the fund shall 223
not be used for either of the following: 224

H. B. No. 115 Page 9
As Introduced
(1) To pay for the inspection costs incurred by a motor 225
vehicle dealer so that the dealer may provide inspection 226
certificates to an individual purchasing a motor vehicle from 227
the dealer when that individual resides in a county that is 228
subject to the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program; 229
(2) To provide payment for more than one free passing 230
emissions inspection or a total of three emissions inspections 231
for a motor vehicle in any three-hundred-sixty-five-day period. 232
The owner or lessee of a motor vehicle is responsible for 233
inspection fees that are related to emissions inspections beyond 234
one free passing emissions inspection or three total emissions 235
inspections in any three-hundred-sixty-five-day period. 236
Inspection fees that are charged by a contractor conducting 237
emissions inspections under a motor vehicle inspection and 238
maintenance program shall be approved by the director of 239
environmental protection. 240
(E) The motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program 241
established under this section expires upon the termination of 242
all contracts entered into under this section and shall not be 243
implemented beyond the final date on which termination occurs. 244
(F) As used in this section "battery electric motor 245
vehicle" has and "hybrid motor vehicle" have the same meaning 246
meanings as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. 247
Sec. 4503.10. (A) The owner of every snowmobile, off- 248
highway motorcycle, and all-purpose vehicle required to be 249
registered under section 4519.02 of the Revised Code shall file 250
an application for registration under section 4519.03 of the 251
Revised Code. The owner of a motor vehicle, other than a 252
snowmobile, off-highway motorcycle, or all-purpose vehicle, that 253
is not designed and constructed by the manufacturer for 254

H. B. No. 115 Page 10
As Introduced
operation on a street or highway may not register it under this 255
chapter except upon certification of inspection pursuant to 256
section 4513.02 of the Revised Code by the sheriff, or the chief 257
of police of the municipal corporation or township, with 258
jurisdiction over the political subdivision in which the owner 259
of the motor vehicle resides. Except as provided in sections 260
4503.103 and 4503.107 of the Revised Code, every owner of every 261
other motor vehicle not previously described in this section and 262
every person mentioned as owner in the last certificate of title 263
of a motor vehicle that is operated or driven upon the public 264
roads or highways shall cause to be filed each year, by mail or 265
otherwise, in the office of the registrar of motor vehicles or a 266
deputy registrar, a written or electronic application or a 267
preprinted registration renewal notice issued under section 268
4503.102 of the Revised Code, the form of which shall be 269
prescribed by the registrar, for registration for the following 270
registration year, which shall begin on the first day of January 271
of every calendar year and end on the thirty-first day of 272
December in the same year. Applications for registration and 273
registration renewal notices shall be filed at the times 274
established by the registrar pursuant to section 4503.101 of the 275
Revised Code. A motor vehicle owner also may elect to apply for 276
or renew a motor vehicle registration by electronic means using 277
electronic signature in accordance with rules adopted by the 278
registrar. Except as provided in division (J) of this section, 279
applications for registration shall be made on blanks furnished 280
by the registrar for that purpose, containing the following 281
information: 282
(1) A brief description of the motor vehicle to be 283
registered, including the year, make, model, and vehicle 284
identification number, and, in the case of commercial cars, the 285

H. B. No. 115 Page 11
As Introduced
gross weight of the vehicle fully equipped computed in the 286
manner prescribed in section 4503.08 of the Revised Code; 287
(2) The name and residence address of the owner, and the 288
township and municipal corporation in which the owner resides; 289
(3) The district of registration, which shall be 290
determined as follows: 291
(a) In case the motor vehicle to be registered is used for 292
hire or principally in connection with any established business 293
or branch business, conducted at a particular place, the 294
district of registration is the municipal corporation in which 295
that place is located or, if not located in any municipal 296
corporation, the county and township in which that place is 297
located. 298
(b) In case the vehicle is not so used, the district of 299
registration is the municipal corporation or county in which the 300
owner resides at the time of making the application. 301
(4) Whether the motor vehicle is a new or used motor 302
vehicle; 303
(5) The date of purchase of the motor vehicle; 304
(6) Whether the fees required to be paid for the 305
registration or transfer of the motor vehicle, during the 306
preceding registration year and during the preceding period of 307
the current registration year, have been paid. Each application 308
for registration shall be signed by the owner, either manually 309
or by electronic signature, or pursuant to obtaining a limited 310
power of attorney authorized by the registrar for registration, 311
or other document authorizing such signature. If the owner 312
elects to apply for or renew the motor vehicle registration with 313
the registrar by electronic means, the owner's manual signature 314

H. B. No. 115 Page 12
As Introduced
is not required. 315
(7) The owner's social security number, driver's license 316
number, or state identification number, or, where a motor 317
vehicle to be registered is used for hire or principally in 318
connection with any established business, the owner's federal 319
taxpayer identification number. The bureau of motor vehicles 320
shall retain in its records all social security numbers provided 321
under this section, but the bureau shall not place social 322
security numbers on motor vehicle certificates of registration. 323
(8) Whether the applicant wishes to certify willingness to 324
make an anatomical gift if an applicant has not so certified 325
under section 2108.05 of the Revised Code. The applicant's 326
response shall not be considered in the decision of whether to 327
approve the application for registration. 328
(B)(1) When an applicant first registers a motor vehicle 329
in the applicant's name, the applicant shall provide proof of 330
ownership of that motor vehicle. Proof of ownership may include 331
any of the following: 332
(a) The applicant may present for inspection a physical 333
certificate of title or memorandum certificate showing title to 334
the motor vehicle to be registered in the name of the applicant. 335
(b) The applicant may present for inspection an electronic 336
certificate of title for the applicant's motor vehicle in a 337
manner prescribed by rules adopted by the registrar. 338
(c) The registrar or deputy registrar may electronically 339
confirm the applicant's ownership of the motor vehicle. 340
An applicant is not required to present a certificate of 341
title to an electronic motor vehicle dealer acting as a limited 342
authority deputy registrar in accordance with rules adopted by 343

H. B. No. 115 Page 13
As Introduced
the registrar. 344
(2) When a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance 345
program is in effect under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code 346
and rules adopted under it, each application for registration 347
for a vehicle required to be inspected under that section and 348
those rules shall be accompanied by an inspection certificate or 349
alternative emissions certificate for the motor vehicle issued 350
in accordance with that section. 351
(3) An application for registration shall be refused if 352
any of the following applies: 353
(a) The application is not in proper form. 354
(b) The application is prohibited from being accepted by 355
division (D) of section 2935.27, division (A) of section 356
4503.13, division (B) of section 4510.22, division (D) of 357
section 4503.234, division (B)(1) of section 4521.10, or 358
division (B) of section 5537.041 of the Revised Code. 359
(c) Proof of ownership is required but is not presented or 360
confirmed in accordance with division (B)(1) of this section. 361
(d) All registration and transfer fees for the motor 362
vehicle, for the preceding year or the preceding period of the 363
current registration year, have not been paid. 364
(e) The owner or lessee does not have an inspection 365
certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the motor 366
vehicle as provided in section 3704.14 of the Revised Code, and 367
rules adopted under it, if that section is applicable. 368
(4) This section does not require the payment of license 369
or registration taxes on a motor vehicle for any preceding year, 370
or for any preceding period of a year, if the motor vehicle was 371

H. B. No. 115 Page 14
As Introduced
not taxable for that preceding year or period under sections 372
4503.02, 4503.04, 4503.11, 4503.12, and 4503.16 or Chapter 4504. 373
of the Revised Code. 374
(5) When a certificate of registration is issued upon the 375
first registration of a motor vehicle by or on behalf of the 376
owner, the official issuing the certificate shall indicate the 377
issuance with a stamp on the certificate of title or memorandum 378
certificate or, in the case of an electronic certificate of 379
title or electronic verification of ownership, an electronic 380
stamp or other notation as specified in rules adopted by the 381
registrar, and with a stamp on the inspection certificate for 382
the motor vehicle, if any. 383
(6) The official also shall indicate, by a stamp or by 384
other means the registrar prescribes, on the registration 385
certificate issued upon the first registration of a motor 386
vehicle by or on behalf of the owner the odometer reading of the 387
motor vehicle as shown in the odometer statement included in or 388
attached to the certificate of title. Upon each subsequent 389
registration of the motor vehicle by or on behalf of the same 390
owner, the official also shall so indicate the odometer reading 391
of the motor vehicle as shown on the immediately preceding 392
certificate of registration. 393
(7) The registrar shall include in the permanent 394
registration record of any vehicle required to be inspected 395
under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code the inspection 396
certificate number from the inspection certificate or the 397
alternative emissions certificate number from the alternative 398
emissions certificate that is presented at the time of 399
registration of the vehicle as required under this division. 400
(C)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(1) of 401

H. B. No. 115 Page 15
As Introduced
this section, the registrar and each deputy registrar shall 402
collect an additional fee of eleven dollars for each application 403
for registration and registration renewal received. For vehicles 404
specified in divisions (A)(1) to (21) of section 4503.042 of the 405
Revised Code, the registrar and deputy registrar shall collect 406
an additional fee of thirty dollars for each application for 407
registration and registration renewal received. No additional 408
fee shall be charged for vehicles registered under section 409
4503.65 of the Revised Code. The additional fee is for the 410
purpose of defraying the department of public safety's costs 411
associated with the administration and enforcement of the motor 412
vehicle and traffic laws of Ohio. Each deputy registrar shall 413
transmit the fees collected under divisions (C)(1) and (3) of 414
this section in the time and manner provided in this section. 415
The registrar shall deposit all moneys received under division 416
(C)(1) of this section into the public safety - highway purposes 417
fund established in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. 418
(2) In addition, a charge of twenty-five cents shall be 419
made for each reflectorized safety license plate issued, and a 420
single charge of twenty-five cents shall be made for each county 421
identification sticker or each set of county identification 422
stickers issued, as the case may be, to cover the cost of 423
producing the license plates and stickers, including material, 424
manufacturing, and administrative costs. Those fees shall be in 425
addition to the license tax. If the total cost of producing the 426
plates is less than twenty-five cents per plate, or if the total 427
cost of producing the stickers is less than twenty-five cents 428
per sticker or per set issued, any excess moneys accruing from 429
the fees shall be distributed in the same manner as provided by 430
section 4501.04 of the Revised Code for the distribution of 431
license tax moneys. If the total cost of producing the plates 432

H. B. No. 115 Page 16
As Introduced
exceeds twenty-five cents per plate, or if the total cost of 433
producing the stickers exceeds twenty-five cents per sticker or 434
per set issued, the difference shall be paid from the license 435
tax moneys collected pursuant to section 4503.02 of the Revised 436
Code. 437
(3) The registrar and each deputy registrar shall collect 438
the following additional fee, as applicable, for each 439
application for registration or registration renewal received 440
for any hybrid motor vehicle, plug-in hybrid electric motor 441
vehicle, or battery electric motor vehicle: 442
(a) One hundred dollars for a hybrid motor vehicle; 443
(b) One hundred fifty dollars for a plug-in hybrid 444
electric motor vehicle; 445
(c) Two hundred dollars for a battery electric motor 446
vehicle. 447
Each fee imposed under this division shall be prorated 448
based on the number of months for which the vehicle is 449
registered. The registrar shall transmit all money arising from 450
each fee to the treasurer of state for distribution in 451
accordance with division (E) of section 5735.051 of the Revised 452
Code, subject to division (D) of section 5735.05 of the Revised 453
Code. 454
(D) Each deputy registrar shall be allowed a fee equal to 455
the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised 456
Code for each application for registration and registration 457
renewal notice the deputy registrar receives, which shall be for 458
the purpose of compensating the deputy registrar for the deputy 459
registrar's services, and such office and rental expenses, as 460
may be necessary for the proper discharge of the deputy 461

H. B. No. 115 Page 17
As Introduced
registrar's duties in the receiving of applications and renewal 462
notices and the issuing of registrations. 463
(E) Upon the certification of the registrar, the county 464
sheriff or local police officials shall recover license plates 465
erroneously or fraudulently issued. 466
(F) Each deputy registrar, upon receipt of any application 467
for registration or registration renewal notice, together with 468
the license fee and any local motor vehicle license tax levied 469
pursuant to Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, shall transmit 470
that fee and tax, if any, in the manner provided in this 471
section, together with the original and duplicate copy of the 472
application, to the registrar. The registrar, subject to the 473
approval of the director of public safety, may deposit the funds 474
collected by those deputies in a local bank or depository to the 475
credit of the "state of Ohio, bureau of motor vehicles." Where a 476
local bank or depository has been designated by the registrar, 477
each deputy registrar shall deposit all moneys collected by the 478
deputy registrar into that bank or depository not more than one 479
business day after their collection and shall make reports to 480
the registrar of the amounts so deposited, together with any 481
other information, some of which may be prescribed by the 482
treasurer of state, as the registrar may require and as 483
prescribed by the registrar by rule. The registrar, within three 484
days after receipt of notification of the deposit of funds by a 485
deputy registrar in a local bank or depository, shall draw on 486
that account in favor of the treasurer of state. The registrar, 487
subject to the approval of the director and the treasurer of 488
state, may make reasonable rules necessary for the prompt 489
transmittal of fees and for safeguarding the interests of the 490
state and of counties, townships, municipal corporations, and 491
transportation improvement districts levying local motor vehicle 492

H. B. No. 115 Page 18
As Introduced
license taxes. The registrar may pay service charges usually 493
collected by banks and depositories for such service. If deputy 494
registrars are located in communities where banking facilities 495
are not available, they shall transmit the fees forthwith, by 496
money order or otherwise, as the registrar, by rule approved by 497
the director and the treasurer of state, may prescribe. The 498
registrar may pay the usual and customary fees for such service. 499
(G) This section does not prevent any person from making 500
an application for a motor vehicle license directly to the 501
registrar by mail, by electronic means, or in person at any of 502
the registrar's offices, upon payment of a service fee equal to 503
the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised 504
Code for each application. 505
(H) No person shall make a false statement as to the 506
district of registration in an application required by division 507
(A) of this section. Violation of this division is falsification 508
under section 2921.13 of the Revised Code and punishable as 509
specified in that section. 510
(I)(1) Where applicable, the requirements of division (B) 511
of this section relating to the presentation of an inspection 512
certificate issued under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and 513
rules adopted under it for a motor vehicle, the refusal of a 514
license for failure to present an inspection certificate or 515
alternative emissions certificate, and the stamping of the 516
inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate by 517
the official issuing the certificate of registration apply to 518
the registration of and issuance of license plates for a motor 519
vehicle under sections 4503.102, 4503.12, 4503.14, 4503.15, 520
4503.16, 4503.171, 4503.172, 4503.19, 4503.40, 4503.41, 4503.42, 521
4503.43, 4503.44, 4503.46, 4503.47, and 4503.51 of the Revised 522

H. B. No. 115 Page 19
As Introduced
Code. 523
(2)(a) The registrar shall adopt rules ensuring that each 524
owner registering a motor vehicle in a county where a motor 525
vehicle inspection and maintenance program is in effect under 526
section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it 527
receives information about the requirements established in that 528
section and those rules and about the need in those counties to 529
present an inspection certificate or an alternative emissions 530
certificate with an application for registration or 531
preregistration. 532
(b) Upon request, the registrar shall provide the director 533
of environmental protection, or any person that has been awarded 534
a contract under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code, an on-line 535
computer data link to registration information for all passenger 536
cars, noncommercial motor vehicles, and commercial cars that are 537
subject to that section. The registrar also shall provide to the 538
director of environmental protection a magnetic data tape 539
containing registration information regarding passenger cars, 540
noncommercial motor vehicles, and commercial cars for which a 541
multi-year registration is in effect under section 4503.103 of 542
the Revised Code or rules adopted under it, including, without 543
limitation, the date of issuance of the multi-year registration, 544
the registration deadline established under rules adopted under 545
section 4503.101 of the Revised Code that was applicable in the 546
year in which the multi-year registration was issued, and the 547
registration deadline for renewal of the multi-year 548
registration. 549
(J) Subject to division (K) of this section, application 550
for registration under the international registration plan, as 551
set forth in sections 4503.60 to 4503.66 of the Revised Code, 552

H. B. No. 115 Page 20
As Introduced
shall be made to the registrar on forms furnished by the 553
registrar. In accordance with international registration plan 554
guidelines and pursuant to rules adopted by the registrar, the 555
forms shall include the following: 556
(1) A uniform mileage schedule; 557
(2) The gross vehicle weight of the vehicle or combined 558
gross vehicle weight of the combination vehicle as declared by 559
the registrant; 560
(3) Any other information the registrar requires by rule. 561
(K) The registrar shall determine the feasibility of 562
implementing an electronic commercial fleet licensing and 563
management program that will enable the owners of commercial 564
tractors, commercial trailers, and commercial semitrailers to 565
conduct electronic transactions by July 1, 2010, or sooner. If 566
the registrar determines that implementing such a program is 567
feasible, the registrar shall adopt new rules under this 568
division or amend existing rules adopted under this division as 569
necessary in order to respond to advances in technology. 570
If international registration plan guidelines and 571
provisions allow member jurisdictions to permit applications for 572
registrations under the international registration plan to be 573
made via the internet, the rules the registrar adopts under this 574
division shall permit such action. 575
Sec. 4503.102. (A) The registrar of motor vehicles shall 576
adopt rules to establish a centralized system of motor vehicle 577
registration renewal by mail or by electronic means. Any person 578
owning a motor vehicle that was registered in the person's name 579
during the preceding registration year shall renew the 580
registration of the motor vehicle not more than ninety days 581

H. B. No. 115 Page 21
As Introduced
prior to the expiration date of the registration either by mail 582
or by electronic means through the centralized system of 583
registration established under this section, or in person at any 584
office of the registrar or at a deputy registrar's office. 585
(B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this 586
section, no less than forty-five days prior to the expiration 587
date of any motor vehicle registration, the registrar shall mail 588
a renewal notice to the person in whose name the motor vehicle 589
is registered. The renewal notice shall clearly state that the 590
registration of the motor vehicle may be renewed by mail or 591
electronic means through the centralized system of registration 592
or in person at any office of the registrar or at a deputy 593
registrar's office and shall be preprinted with information 594
including, but not limited to, the owner's name and residence 595
address as shown in the records of the bureau of motor vehicles, 596
a brief description of the motor vehicle to be registered, 597
notice of the license taxes and fees due on the motor vehicle, 598
the toll-free telephone number of the registrar as required 599
under division (D)(1) of section 4503.031 of the Revised Code, a 600
statement that payment for a renewal may be made by financial 601
transaction device using the toll-free telephone number, and any 602
additional information the registrar may require by rule. The 603
renewal notice shall not include the social security number of 604
either the owner of the motor vehicle or the person in whose 605
name the motor vehicle is registered. The renewal notice shall 606
be sent by regular mail to the owner's last known address as 607
shown in the records of the bureau of motor vehicles. 608
(2) The registrar is not required to mail a renewal notice 609
if either of the following applies: 610
(a) The owner of the vehicle has consented to receiving 611

H. B. No. 115 Page 22
As Introduced
the renewal notice by electronic means only. 612
(b) The application for renewal of the registration of a 613
motor vehicle is prohibited from being accepted by the registrar 614
or a deputy registrar by division (D) of section 2935.27, 615
division (A) of section 4503.13, division (B) of section 616
4510.22, division (D) of section 4503.234, division (B)(1) of 617
section 4521.10, or division (B) of section 5537.041 of the 618
Revised Code. 619
(3) If the owner of a motor vehicle has consented to 620
receiving a renewal notice by electronic means only, the 621
registrar shall send an electronic renewal notice to the owner 622
that contains the information specified in division (B)(1) of 623
this section at the time specified under that division. 624
(C) The owner of the motor vehicle shall verify the 625
information contained in the notice, sign it either manually or 626
by electronic means, and return it, either by mail or electronic 627
means, or the owner may take it in person to any office of the 628
registrar or of a deputy registrar. The owner shall include with 629
the notice a financial transaction device number when renewing 630
in person or by electronic means but not by mail, check, or 631
money order in the amount of the registration taxes and fees 632
payable on the motor vehicle and a service fee equal to the 633
amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code, 634
plus postage as indicated on the notice if the registration is 635
renewed or fulfilled by mail, and an inspection certificate or 636
alternative emissions certificate for the motor vehicle as 637
provided in section 3704.14 of the Revised Code. For purposes of 638
the centralized system of motor vehicle registration, the 639
registrar shall accept payments via the toll-free telephone 640
number established under division (D)(1) of section 4503.031 of 641

H. B. No. 115 Page 23
As Introduced
the Revised Code for renewals made by mail. If the motor vehicle 642
owner chooses to renew the motor vehicle registration by 643
electronic means, the owner shall proceed in accordance with the 644
rules the registrar adopts. 645
(D) If all registration and transfer fees for the motor 646
vehicle for the preceding year or the preceding period of the 647
current registration year have not been paid, if division (D) of 648
section 2935.27, division (A) of section 4503.13, division (B) 649
of section 4510.22, division (D) of section 4503.234, division 650
(B)(1) of section 4521.10, or division (B) of section 5537.041 651
of the Revised Code prohibits acceptance of the renewal notice, 652
or if the owner or lessee does not have an inspection 653
certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the motor 654
vehicle as provided in section 3704.14 of the Revised Code, if 655
that section is applicable, the license shall be refused, and 656
the registrar or deputy registrar shall so notify the owner. 657
This section does not require the payment of license or 658
registration taxes on a motor vehicle for any preceding year, or 659
for any preceding period of a year, if the motor vehicle was not 660
taxable for that preceding year or period under section 4503.02, 661
4503.04, 4503.11, 4503.12, or 4503.16 or Chapter 4504. of the 662
Revised Code. 663
(E)(1) Failure to receive a renewal notice does not 664
relieve a motor vehicle owner from the responsibility to renew 665
the registration for the motor vehicle. Any person who has a 666
motor vehicle registered in this state and who does not receive 667
a renewal notice as provided in division (B) of this section 668
prior to the expiration date of the registration shall request 669
an application for registration from the registrar or a deputy 670
registrar and sign the application manually or by electronic 671
means and submit the application and pay any applicable license 672

H. B. No. 115 Page 24
As Introduced
taxes and fees to the registrar or deputy registrar. 673
(2) If the owner of a motor vehicle submits an application 674
for registration and the registrar is prohibited by division (D) 675
of section 2935.27, division (A) of section 4503.13, division 676
(B) of section 4510.22, division (D) of section 4503.234, 677
division (B)(1) of section 4521.10, or division (B) of section 678
5537.041 of the Revised Code from accepting the application, the 679
registrar shall return the application and the payment to the 680
owner. If the owner of a motor vehicle submits a registration 681
renewal application to the registrar by electronic means and the 682
registrar is prohibited from accepting the application as 683
provided in this division, the registrar shall notify the owner 684
of this fact and deny the application and return the payment or 685
give a credit on the financial transaction device account of the 686
owner in the manner the registrar prescribes by rule adopted 687
pursuant to division (A) of this section. 688
(F) Every deputy registrar shall post in a prominent place 689
at the deputy's office a notice informing the public of the mail 690
registration system required by this section and also shall post 691
a notice that every owner of a motor vehicle and every chauffeur 692
holding a certificate of registration is required to notify the 693
registrar in writing of any change of residence within ten days 694
after the change occurs. The notice shall be in such form as the 695
registrar prescribes by rule. 696
(G) The service fee equal to the amount established under 697
section 4503.038 of the Revised Code that is collected from a 698
person who renews a motor vehicle registration by electronic 699
means or by mail, plus postage collected by the registrar and 700
any financial transaction device surcharge collected by the 701
registrar, shall be paid to the credit of the public safety - 702

H. B. No. 115 Page 25
As Introduced
highway purposes fund established by section 4501.06 of the 703
Revised Code. 704
(H)(1) Pursuant to section 113.40 of the Revised Code, the 705
registrar shall implement a program permitting payment of motor 706
vehicle registration taxes and fees, driver's license and 707
commercial driver's license fees, and any other taxes, fees, 708
penalties, or charges imposed or levied by the state by means of 709
a financial transaction device for transactions occurring 710
online, at any office of the registrar, and at all deputy 711
registrar locations. The program shall take effect not later 712
than July 1, 2016. The registrar shall adopt rules as necessary 713
for this purpose, but all such rules are subject to any action, 714
policy, or procedure of the board of deposit or treasurer of 715
state taken or adopted under section 113.40 of the Revised Code. 716
(2) The rules adopted under division (H)(1) of this 717
section shall require a deputy registrar to accept payments by 718
means of a financial transaction device beginning on the 719
effective date of the rules unless the deputy registrar contract 720
entered into by the deputy registrar prohibits the acceptance of 721
such payments by financial transaction device. However, 722
commencing with deputy registrar contract awards that have a 723
start date of July 1, 2016, and for all contract awards 724
thereafter, the registrar shall require that the proposer accept 725
payment by means of a financial transaction device, including 726
credit cards and debit cards, for all department of public 727
safety transactions conducted at that deputy registrar location. 728
The bureau and deputy registrars are not required to pay 729
any costs that result from accepting payment by means of a 730
financial transaction device. A deputy registrar may charge a 731
person who tenders payment for a department transaction by means 732

H. B. No. 115 Page 26
As Introduced
of a financial transaction device any cost the deputy registrar 733
incurs from accepting payment by the financial transaction 734
device, but the deputy registrar shall not require the person to 735
pay any additional fee of any kind in connection with the use by 736
the person of the financial transaction device. 737
(3) In accordance with division (H)(1) of this section and 738
rules adopted by the registrar under that division, a county 739
auditor or clerk of a court of common pleas that is designated a 740
deputy registrar shall accept payment by means of a financial 741
transaction device, including credit cards and debit cards, for 742
all department transactions conducted at the office of the 743
county auditor or clerk in the county auditor's or clerk's 744
capacity as deputy registrar. The bureau is not required to pay 745
any costs incurred by a county auditor or clerk that result from 746
accepting payment by means of a financial transaction device for 747
any department transaction. 748
(I) For persons who reside in counties where tailpipe 749
emissions inspections are required under the motor vehicle 750
inspection and maintenance program, the notice required by 751
division (B) of this section shall also include the toll-free 752
telephone number maintained by the Ohio environmental protection 753
agency to provide information concerning the locations of 754
emissions testing centers. The registrar also shall include a 755
statement in the notice that a battery electric motor vehicle is 756
not required to undergo emissions inspection under the motor 757
vehicle inspection and maintenance program established under 758
section 3704.14 of the Revised Code. 759
Sec. 4503.103. (A)(1) The registrar of motor vehicles may 760
adopt rules to permit any person or lessee, other than a person 761
receiving an apportioned license plate under the international 762

H. B. No. 115 Page 27
As Introduced
registration plan, who owns or leases one or more motor vehicles 763
to file a written application for registration for no more than 764
five succeeding registration years. The rules adopted by the 765
registrar may designate the classes of motor vehicles that are 766
eligible for such registration. At the time of application, all 767
annual taxes and fees shall be paid for each year for which the 768
person is registering. 769
(2)(a) The registrar shall adopt rules to permit any 770
person or lessee who owns or leases a trailer or semitrailer 771
that is subject to the tax rate prescribed in either division 772
(C)(1) or, beginning January 1, 2022, (C)(2) of section 4503.042 773
of the Revised Code to file a written application for 774
registration for any number of succeeding registration years, 775
including a permanent registration, for such trailers or 776
semitrailers. 777
At the time of application, the applicant shall pay all of 778
the following: 779
(i) As applicable, either the annual tax prescribed in 780
division (C)(1) of section 4503.042 of the Revised Code for each 781
year for which the applicant is registering or the annual tax 782
prescribed in division (C)(2) of section 4503.042 of the Revised 783
Code, unless the applicant previously paid the tax specified in 784
division (C)(2) of that section for the trailer or semitrailer 785
being registered. However, an applicant paying the annual tax 786
under division (C)(1) of section 4503.042 of the Revised Code 787
shall not pay more than eight times the annual taxes due, 788
regardless of the number of years for which the applicant is 789
registering. 790
(ii) The additional fee established under division (C)(1) 791
of section 4503.10 of the Revised Code for each year of 792

H. B. No. 115 Page 28
As Introduced
registration, provided that not more than eight times the 793
additional fee due shall be paid, regardless of the number of 794
years for which the applicant is registering. 795
(iii) One single deputy registrar service fee in the 796
amount specified in division (D) of section 4503.10 of the 797
Revised Code or one single bureau of motor vehicles service fee 798
in the amount specified in division (G) of that section, as 799
applicable, regardless of the number of years for which the 800
applicant is registering. 801
(b) In addition, each applicant registering a trailer or 802
semitrailer under division (A)(2)(a) of this section shall pay 803
any applicable local motor vehicle license tax levied under 804
Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code for each year for which the 805
applicant is registering, provided that not more than eight 806
times any such annual local taxes shall be due upon 807
registration. 808
(c) The period of registration for a trailer or 809
semitrailer registered under division (A)(2)(a) of this section 810
is exclusive to the trailer or semitrailer for which that 811
certificate of registration is issued and is not transferable to 812
any other trailer or semitrailer if the registration is a 813
permanent registration. 814
(3) Except as provided in division (A)(4) of this section, 815
the registrar shall adopt rules to permit any person who owns a 816
motor vehicle to file an application for registration for not 817
more than five succeeding registration years. At the time of 818
application, the person shall pay the annual taxes and fees for 819
each registration year, calculated in accordance with division 820
(C) of section 4503.11 of the Revised Code. A person who is 821
registering a vehicle under division (A)(3) of this section 822

H. B. No. 115 Page 29
As Introduced
shall pay for each year of registration the additional fee 823
established under division (C)(1) or (3) of section 4503.10 of 824
the Revised Code, as applicable. The person shall also pay the 825
deputy registrar service fee or the bureau of motor vehicles 826
service fee equal to the amount established under section 827
4503.038 of the Revised Code. 828
(4) Division (A)(3) of this section does not apply to a 829
person receiving an apportioned license plate under the 830
international registration plan, or the owner of a commercial 831
car used solely in intrastate commerce, or the owner of a bus as 832
defined in section 4513.50 of the Revised Code. 833
(5) A person registering a noncommercial trailer 834
permanently shall register the trailer under section 4503.107 of 835
the Revised Code. 836
(B) No person applying for a multi-year registration under 837
division (A) of this section is entitled to a refund of any 838
taxes or fees paid. 839
(C) The registrar shall not issue to any applicant who has 840
been issued a final, nonappealable order under division (D) of 841
this section a multi-year registration or renewal thereof under 842
this division or rules adopted under it for any motor vehicle 843
that is required to be inspected under section 3704.14 of the 844
Revised Code the district of registration of which, as 845
determined under section 4503.10 of the Revised Code, is or is 846
located in the county named in the order. 847
(D) Upon receipt from the director of environmental 848
protection of a notice issued under rules adopted under section 849
3704.14 of the Revised Code indicating that an owner of a motor 850
vehicle that is required to be inspected under that section who 851

H. B. No. 115 Page 30
As Introduced
obtained a multi-year registration for the vehicle under 852
division (A) of this section or rules adopted under that 853
division has not obtained a required inspection certificate or 854
alternative emissions certificate for the vehicle, the registrar 855
in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code shall issue 856
an order to the owner impounding the certificate of registration 857
and identification license plates for the vehicle. The order 858
also shall prohibit the owner from obtaining or renewing a 859
multi-year registration for any vehicle that is required to be 860
inspected under that section, the district of registration of 861
which is or is located in the same county as the county named in 862
the order during the number of years after expiration of the 863
current multi-year registration that equals the number of years 864
for which the current multi-year registration was issued. 865
An order issued under this division shall require the 866
owner to surrender to the registrar the certificate of 867
registration and license plates for the vehicle named in the 868
order within five days after its issuance. If the owner fails to 869
do so within that time, the registrar shall certify that fact to 870
the county sheriff or local police officials who shall recover 871
the certificate of registration and license plates for the 872
vehicle. 873
(E) Upon the occurrence of either of the following 874
circumstances, the registrar in accordance with Chapter 119. of 875
the Revised Code shall issue to the owner a modified order 876
rescinding the provisions of the order issued under division (D) 877
of this section impounding the certificate of registration and 878
license plates for the vehicle named in that original order: 879
(1) Receipt from the director of environmental protection 880
of a subsequent notice under rules adopted under section 3704.14 881

H. B. No. 115 Page 31
As Introduced
of the Revised Code that the owner has obtained the inspection 882
certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the vehicle 883
as required under those rules; 884
(2) Presentation to the registrar by the owner of the 885
required inspection certificate or alternative emissions 886
certificate for the vehicle. 887
(F) The owner of a motor vehicle for which the certificate 888
of registration and license plates have been impounded pursuant 889
to an order issued under division (D) of this section, upon 890
issuance of a modified order under division (E) of this section, 891
may apply to the registrar for their return. A fee of two 892
dollars and fifty cents shall be charged for the return of the 893
certificate of registration and license plates for each vehicle 894
named in the application. 895
Section 2. That existing sections 3704.14, 4503.10, 896
4503.102, and 4503.103 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 897
Section 3. This act shall be known as the "E-Check Ease 898
Act." 899